Massachusetts, session 194th, H732.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 69 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 1T as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, the following section:-  
Section 1U. The department shall establish program standards for a high school 
professional development program providing rigorous, ongoing professional development to 
high school students, which shall include: (1) qualifications for professional development 
instructors; (2) training for professional development instructors to identify individual student 
professional development needs; (3) different models of professional development, as needed to 
meet student population professional development needs; (4) student access to professional 
development programs remotely or in person; (5) a comprehensive feedback system to plan, 
evaluate and improve on student professional development offerings; and (6) the opportunity for 
students to develop professional relationships with organizations and individuals outside the 
students’ school. The department shall approve any high school professional development 
program established by a school district that meets the department’s program standards.  

of 2 14  SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 76 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the third sentence the following sentence:- In addition to all other 
absences excused by this section, or any other absence that constitutes an excused absence under 
the school or school committee’s rules, the superintendent, or teachers in so far as authorized by 
the superintendent or by the school committee, shall excuse 1 absence for a supervised 
professional development day each school year for high school students.